California, session 20252026, AB654.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6.7 (commencing with Section 53128) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to read: Article 6.7. Homelessness Resource Telephone System53128. (a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1)“Local public agency” means a city, county, city and county, and joint powers authority that provides a public safety answering point (PSAP).(2)“Homelessness “homelessness resource telephone system” means a system structured to provide access to resources provided by a local public agency to help address homelessness.(b) A local public agency may The County of Los Angeles shall establish a homelessness resource telephone system to receive telephone calls regarding individuals who are experiencing, or at risk of experiencing, homelessness in order to provide those individuals with resources.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances facing the County of Los Angeles with regard to homelessness.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.